South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3755.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 31, Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-3995. (A) It is unlawful for a person to drive a motor vehicle on the highways of this State with its hazard lights on when the vehicle is not involved in an accident or is not experiencing a mechanical emergency. (B) A person who is adjudicated to be in violation of the provisions of this section must be fined not more than twenty-five dollars, no part of which may be suspended. No court costs, assessments, or surcharges may be assessed against a person who violates a provision of this section. A person must not be fined more than fifty dollars for any one incident of one or more violations of the provisions of this section. A custodial arrest for a violation of this section must not be made, except upon a warrant issued for failure to appear in court when summoned or for failure to pay an imposed fine. A violation of this section does not constitute a criminal offense. Notwithstanding Section 56-1-640, a violation of this article must not be: (1) included in the offender's motor vehicle records maintained by the Department of Motor Vehicles or in the criminal records maintained by SLED; or (2) reported to the offender's motor vehicle insurer. (C) A law enforcement officer must not issue a citation to a driver for a violation of this section when the stop is made in conjunction with a driver's license check, safety check, or registration check conducted at a checkpoint established to stop all drivers on a certain road for a period of time, except when the driver is cited for violating another motor vehicle law. (C) A violation of this section is not negligence per se or contributory negligence, and is not admissible as evidence in a civil action. (D) A vehicle, driver, or occupant in a vehicle must not be searched, nor may consent to search be requested by a law enforcement officer, solely because of a violation of this section. (E) A person charged with a violation of this section may admit or deny the violation, enter a plea of nolo contendere, or be tried before either a judge or a jury. If the trier of fact is convinced beyond a reasonable doubt that the person drove his vehicle with its hazard lights on unlawfully, the penalty is a civil fine pursuant to Section 56-5-6540. If the trier of fact determines that the State has failed to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the person drove his vehicle with its hazard lights on unlawfully, no penalty shall be assessed. (G) A person found to be in violation of this section may bring an appeal to the court of common pleas pursuant to Section 18-3-10 or Section 14-25-95. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----